Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The Invasive Species Council shall  report biennially concerning the activities
of the council during the previous two years to an interim  committee of the Legislative As-
sembly related to natural  resources in the manner provided in ORS 192.245. The report may
include other material at the discretion of the council.
SECTION 2.  ORS 570.770 is amended to read:
570.770. [(1) The Invasive Species Council is established  within the State Department of Agricul-
ture. The council  shall consist of 18 members. The State Invasive Species Coordinator appointed under
ORS 570.780 is a nonvoting ex officio member of the council. The following persons are  voting ex
officio members of the council: ]
[(a) The Director of Agriculture or a designated representative. ]
[(b) The president of Portland State University or a designated representative. ]
[(c) The State Fish and Wildlife Director or a designated representative. ]
[(d) The administrative head of the Sea Grant College of Oregon State University  or a designated
representative.]
[(e) The State Forester or a designated representative. ]
[(f) The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality or a designated representative. ]
[(g) The State Marine Director or a designated representative. ]
[(2) The voting ex officio members of the council described in subsection (1) of this section  shall
collectively appoint 10 voting members to the council. ]
[(3) The term of office of each appointed voting member is two years, but an appointed  voting
member serves at  the pleasure of the voting ex officio members of the council. Before the expiration of
a term, the voting ex officio members of the council shall appoint a successor whose  term begins on
January 1  next following. An appointed voting member may not serve more than two successive terms
on the council. If there is a vacancy in an appointed voting member position for any cause,  the voting
ex officio members of the council shall make an  appointment to become immediately effective for the
unexpired term.]
[(4) In making appointments to the council, the voting ex officio members  of the council shall en-
deavor to appoint  persons representative of the geographic, cultural and economic diversity of this state.
The voting ex officio members of the council may give consideration to nominations submitted by  fed-
eral and state agencies, local governments, universities, industry and other groups  having an interest
in invasive species. ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 445 (SB 445-A) Page 1
(1) The Invasive Species Council is established within the State  Department of Agricul-
ture. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this  section, the council consists of 22 members,
as follows:
(a) Eight members are ex officio voting members with terms that do  not expire. The ex
officio voting members are:
(A) The Director of Agriculture, or a designated representative.
(B) The Director of the Center for Lakes  and Reservoirs, or a designated representative.
(C) The State Fish and Wildlife Director, or a designated representative.
(D) The director of the Sea Grant College program, or a designated representative.
(E) The State Forester, or a designated representative.
(F) The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, or  a designated repre-
sentative.
(G) The State Marine Director, or a designated representative.
(H) The State Parks and Recreation Director, or a designated representative.
(b) Ten members are voting members. The ex officio voting members identified  in para-
graph (a) of this subsection shall jointly appoint the voting  members for a term of two years,
but each appointed voting member serves at the pleasure of the ex officio  voting members.
Before a voting member’s term expires, the ex officio voting members shall appoint  a suc-
cessor with a term that begins on January 1 next following. An appointed  voting member
may not serve on the council for more than two consecutive terms. If a  vacancy in a voting
member’s position occurs, the ex officio members shall make an appointment that  becomes
immediately effective and that continues until the end of the  term of the vacating voting
member. In appointing voting members, the ex officio voting  members shall ensure to the
extent possible that the appointments represent the geographic, cultural and economic di-
versity of this state. Each appointment of a voting member must represent a different  cat-
egory of interest, as follows:
(A) A member who represents an organization or association  with the purpose of advo-
cating environmental stewardship;
(B) A member who represents an organization or association that advocates on behalf
of private industry in this state;
(C) A member who represents a native American or Indian tribe or association of  tribes
within this state;
(D) A  member who represents an entity, regardless of the form of the entity, with a
headquarters or principal operations in Coos, Curry, Douglas, Jackson or Josephine Counties
and with a purpose of responding to invasive species concerns;
(E) A member who represents an entity, regardless of the form of the entity,  with a
headquarters or principal operations in Gilliam, Hood River, Jefferson,  Morrow, Sherman,
Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco or Wheeler Counties and with a purpose of  responding to
invasive species concerns;
(F) A member who represents  an entity, regardless of the form of the entity, with a
headquarters or principal operations in Clatsop, Columbia, Lincoln or Tillamook Counties and
with a purpose of responding to invasive species concerns;
(G) A member who represents an entity, regardless of the form of the entity, with  a
headquarters or principal  operations in Baker, Crook, Deschutes, Grant, Harney, Klamath,
Lake or Malheur Counties and with a purpose of responding to invasive species concerns;
(H) A member who represents an entity, regardless of the form of the entity, with  a
headquarters or principal operations in Benton, Lane, Linn, Marion or Polk Counties and
with a purpose of responding to invasive species concerns;
(I) A member who  represents an entity, regardless of the form of the entity, with a
headquarters or principal operations  in Clackamas, Multnomah, Washington or Yamhill
Counties and with a purpose of responding to invasive species concerns; and
(J) A member who represents the public.
Enrolled Senate Bill 445 (SB 445-A) Page 2
(c) Four members are ex officio nonvoting members without a  specified term of service.
The ex officio nonvoting members are:
(A) The State Invasive Species Coordinator;
(B) A representative of the Governor with expertise in natural resource issues;
(C) A member of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate;
(D) A member of the House of Representatives  appointed by the Speaker of the House
of Representatives.
(2) The voting members of the council shall invite the United States Department  of the
Interior, the United States  Department of Agriculture and the United States Department of
Homeland Security, and may invite other federal agencies, to designate representatives as
ex officio nonvoting members of the council without specified terms of service.
[(5)] (3)  A [ voting appointed ] member of the council is not entitled to compensation under  ORS
292.495. A member of the council  other than the State Invasive Species  Coordinator is not en-
titled to reimbursement for expenses. At the discretion of the council, council members  may be re-
imbursed from funds available to the council for actual and necessary travel and  other expenses
[incurred by ] that  members of the  council  incur  in [ the performance of their ] performing the
members’ official duties, subject to the limits described in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 570.775 is amended to read:
570.775. (1) The Invasive Species Council  each year  shall select a voting [ ex officio ] member of
the council as  chairperson and another voting [ ex officio ] member as vice chairperson. [ Each voting
ex officio member of the council shall serve one year as chairperson and one  year as vice chairperson
during any five-year period. The  chairperson and vice chairperson shall have duties and powers nec-
essary for the performance of the functions of those offices  as a majority of the voting ex officio mem-
bers determines. ] The council by rule shall specify terms  and provide appropriate duties and
powers for the chairperson and vice chairperson.
(2) A majority of the voting members of the council  constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(3) The council shall meet at times and  places specified by the call of the chairperson or of a
majority of the voting members of the council.
SECTION 4. (1) Section 1 of this 2019  Act and the amendments to ORS 570.770 and 570.775
by sections 2 and 3 of this 2019 Act become operative on January 1, 2020.
(2) The Invasive Species Council may adopt rules and take any  other action before the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the
council, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, to  exercise
all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the council by section  1 of this 2019 Act
and the amendments to ORS 570.770 and 570.775 by sections 2 and 3 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 445 (SB 445-A) Page 3
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 445 (SB 445-A) Page 4